Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
43-1-110. Powers and duties of the chief engineer - hearings - rule-making.

The chief engineer is the director of the engineering, design, and construction division and has direct control and management of the functions of the division subject only to the direction and supervision of the executive director as prescribed in this part 1. The chief engineer shall attend all meetings of the commission and, except as otherwise provided by this part 1 or other law, the chief engineer shall perform all of the duties and exercise all of the powers vested by law in the engineering, design, and construction division, including the awarding, under the supervision of the executive director, of all contracts for the construction or maintenance of state highways and mass transportation projects. It is the duty of the chief engineer in the administration of the division to so organize the same that all employees of the division, so far as possible, are interchangeable in work assignment and may be shifted within the division to meet seasonal and emergency demands.

Repealed.

The chief engineer and the executive director are hereby authorized to accept, on behalf of the state, any federal moneys made available for highway, railway, mass transit, and other public transportation purposes for which no regional or local subdivision of the state has operating authority; except that, if an intergovernmental agreement between the Denver regional transportation district and the department concerning the southeast corridor intermodal transportation project is not signed by October 15, 1999, then the chief engineer and the executive director are authorized to accept, on behalf of the state, any federal transit funds made available.

The executive director or the chief engineer shall represent the department in negotiations with local governmental entities concerning intergovernmental agreements between the department and such local governmental entities to implement the provisions of this article. No such intergovernmental agreement involving more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars shall become effective without the approval of the commission.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1030, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 543, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2015:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 175, § 5, effective March 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-106 as it existed prior to 1991.

43-1-111. Engineer to acquire property.

On behalf of the department of transportation, the chief engineer has the authority to take and hold and to contract to take and hold title to real property, or any interest therein, in the name of the department of transportation, whether such real property or interest is used, or intended to be used, for right-of-way or maintenance purposes or for any other purpose authorized by law.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-107 as it existed prior to 1991.

43-1-112. Legal services.

The attorney general shall provide legal services for the department of transportation, including the commission.

The executive director shall cause the attorney general to bring and prosecute for and defend on behalf of and in the name of the department, or any of its divisions, suits and proceedings:

To acquire rights-of-way and other property for the department as provided by law for transportation purposes;

To recover damages for negligence resulting in injury to property of the department as provided in subsection (3) of this section, but such damages shall be diminished in proportion to the amount of negligence, if any, attributable to the department;

To enforce or recover damages for the breach of contracts entered into by the department;

To quiet title to or to recover real or personal property or any interest or right therein;

For any other purpose necessary and proper for carrying out the functions of the department.

To recover damages to property of the department pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall send by first-class mail a written bill for the damage to any person causing such damage. If the person disputes liability for the damage or the amount of the bill, the person may file within twenty days of receipt of the bill an appeal with the department's chief engineer in charge of operations and maintenance in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-105, C.R.S. The bill shall provide notice of the right to appeal.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2)(b) amended and (3) added, p. 1301, § 3, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-108 as it existed prior to 1991.

43-1-112.5. Establishment of annual allowable revenues and expenditures by general assembly.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Section 20 of article X of the state constitution limits state fiscal year spending;

Subject to certain exclusions specified in section 20 of article X of the state constitution, all state general fund expenditures and all state cash fund expenditures, including expenditures of the department and the commission, are included in the limitation on state fiscal year spending;

The legislative powers of the general assembly, including but not limited to its plenary power of appropriation, authorize and require the general assembly to assure compliance with the limitation on state fiscal year spending and to make fundamental fiscal policy decisions establishing the level of activity of all departments and agencies of state government, including the department and the commission; and

Consonant with the exercise of such legislative powers, the general assembly must establish limits on the revenues under the jurisdiction of and the expenditures of the department and the commission.

For the 1993-94 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, the general assembly, in the general appropriation bill or by separate bill, shall prescribe the total amount of allowable revenues which may be collected and expenditures which may be made by the department and the commission for the fiscal year. The amounts prescribed by the general assembly pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be based upon the determination of the limitation on state fiscal year spending under section 20 of article X of the state constitution and upon decisions establishing the level of activity of all departments and agencies of state government, including the department and the commission.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1512, § 15, effective June 6.

43-1-113. Funds - budgets - fiscal year - reports and publications.

All funds and moneys to the credit of the department of transportation shall be expended under the supervision and direction of the commission within the total expenditures prescribed by the general assembly for the fiscal year pursuant to section 43-1-112.5; except that moneys in the aviation fund shall be expended pursuant to the provisions of article 10 of this title.

Annually on or before December 15, the commission shall adopt and the department of transportation shall submit to the joint budget committee, the house transportation and energy committee, the senate transportation committee, and the governor a proposed budget allocation plan for moneys subject to its jurisdiction for the fiscal year beginning on July 1 of the succeeding year. The plan shall be submitted in a format determined by the joint budget committee and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

Estimates of all available revenues displayed by source of moneys, including any carry forward balances anticipated and any restrictions on any available moneys;

All interest and debt redemption charges during the fiscal year;

Allocation of spending, by the following categories of expenditure:

Maintenance of the state highway system;

Construction projects on the state highway system, including capacity increases;

Administration, which is deemed to include salaries and expenses of the following offices and their staffs: Commission, executive director, chief engineer, district engineers, budget, internal audits, public relations, equal employment, special activities, accounting, administrative services, building operations, management systems, personnel, procurement, insurance, legal, and central data processing;

Other departmental staff which are allocated to maintenance or construction costs on the state highway system and the basis for such allocation;

Repealed.

Estimated statewide indirect cost recoveries of state agencies payable from the state highway fund as required by subsection (8) of this section.

Repealed.

Any land acquisitions pursuant to maintenance or construction projects, including land acquisitions which may be accomplished by eminent domain;

All construction and maintenance projects, grouped by priority order according to both transportation commission district and statewide priority;

A summary of allocation of spending for the current fiscal year indicating expenditures which are different from recommended changes made to the proposed budget allocation plan by the joint budget committee, the house transportation and energy committee, and the senate transportation committee in their responses to such plan for the current fiscal year;

A procedure for dealing with emergencies and contingencies unforeseen at the time of the preparation of the plan and an enumeration of other spending which could be reduced in order to deal with such emergencies or contingencies.

(2.5) Annually on or before October 1, the commission shall submit a request for state highway reconstruction, repair, or maintenance projects to the capital development committee to be funded from money transferred to the capital construction fund pursuant to section 24-75-302 (2), C.R.S. Such request must be made in accordance with section 2-3-1304 (1)(a.5), C.R.S.

For the fiscal year 1993-94 and for each fiscal year thereafter, appropriations made by the general assembly to the department of transportation for administrative expenditures, which are listed in subparagraph (III) of paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, shall be set forth in a single line item as a total sum, and such expenditures shall not be identified by project, program, or district.

The provisions of this subsection (3) shall not apply to the aeronautics division.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 593, § 1, effective August 3, 2007.)

Repealed.

The amount budgeted for administration in no case shall exceed five percent of the total budget allocation plan. In addition to any other requirements, the budget allocation plan shall include a general state transportation budget summary setting forth the aggregate figures of the budget in such manner as to show the balanced relations between the total proposed expenditures and total anticipated revenues, together with the other means of financing the budget for the ensuing fiscal year compiled with corresponding figures for the last completed fiscal year and the fiscal year in progress. It shall also include the statements of the bonded indebtedness of the department of transportation showing the debt redemption requirements, the debt authorized and unissued, and the contents of the sinking funds. As an addendum to the budget allocation plan, there shall be published a complete list of all projects budgeted in prior years which have not been deleted or progressed to completion, including all funds carried over from the budget of previous years, whether resulting from construction or operation for less than the budgeted figure or from incomplete or deleted projects.

Repealed.

Repealed.

The department, out of moneys in the state highway fund budgeted therefor by the transportation commission and within the total expenditures prescribed by the general assembly for the fiscal year pursuant to section 43-1-112.5, shall reimburse other agencies of state government for the costs incurred by such state agencies in providing necessary services in support of the department and the administration of the highway funds of the state. Such state agencies include, but are not necessarily limited to, the office of the state controller in the department of personnel, the office of state planning and budgeting, the department of personnel, the department of revenue, and the department of the treasury. For any fiscal year, the amount paid to any such state agency shall be the amount indicated in the general appropriation act as the recovery of indirect costs by such state agency out of the state highway fund. The amount so indicated in the general appropriation act for the recovery of indirect costs by any state agency pursuant to this subsection (8) may exceed the actual indirect cost incurred by such agency, but the total of all such statewide indirect cost recoveries indicated in the general appropriation act shall not exceed the total indirect costs reasonably expected to be incurred by all state agencies in providing necessary services in support of the department and the administration of the highway funds of the state. Payments made pursuant to this subsection (8) shall not be subject to the limitations on appropriations and statutory distributions from the highway users tax fund contained in section 43-4-201 (3).

Repealed.

The house transportation and energy committee and the senate transportation committee shall hold a joint meeting, including the opportunity for a public hearing, for the purpose of review and comment on the proposed budget allocation plan. No later than March 15 of each year, the official response of the house transportation and energy committee and the senate transportation committee to the proposed budget allocation plan, along with any recommended changes to such plan, shall be transmitted to the commission. The joint budget committee may also, by said March 15, transmit to the commission its response to the proposed budget allocation plan. The staff of the joint budget committee shall be available to assist the house transportation and energy committee and the senate transportation committee in their joint review of the proposed budget allocation plan. Nothing contained in this paragraph (a) shall be construed to affect the general powers and duties of the joint budget committee relating to its review of the executive budget and the budget requests of state agencies, including the department of transportation, under section 2-3-203, C.R.S.

Repealed.

No later than April 15 of each year, the commission shall adopt a final budget allocation plan which shall, upon approval of the governor, constitute the budget for the department for the ensuing fiscal year and which shall comply with the total revenues and expenditures prescribed by the general assembly for such fiscal year pursuant to section 43-1-112.5. Concurrent with submission of the final budget allocation plan to the governor, the commission shall submit in writing to the general assembly its responses to the recommendations of the joint budget committee, the house transportation and energy committee, and the senate transportation committee, or any successor committees. The final budget allocation plan may include some or all of the changes recommended by such committees, but no other changes from the proposed budget allocation plan may be made; except that the commission shall ensure that the final budget allocation plan is within the total revenues and expenditures prescribed by the general assembly pursuant to section 43-1-112.5, and the commission may adopt, consistent with said prescribed amounts, amendments reflecting increases or decreases in revenue or expenditures not anticipated at the time of adoption of the proposed budget allocation plan, amendments increasing or decreasing expenditures as a result of emergencies or contingencies unforeseen at the time of the preparation of the proposed budget allocation plan, and amendments reflecting changes in the amounts indicated in the general appropriation act as statewide indirect cost recoveries payable from the state highway fund as provided in subsection (8) of this section.

This paragraph (c) is effective July 1, 1992.

The department shall report monthly to the commission within fifteen days after the close of each month the expenditures made from each budget category and the unexpended and unencumbered balance of each budget subcategory and shall make the report publicly available on its website. The department shall also submit a monthly report of financial information to the controller no later than fifteen days after the close of each month. The report must include sufficient financial information for the controller to complete a review of legal overexpenditures, any deficit fund balances, and a budget-to-actual report for all budget lines within the annual general appropriations act as well as any additional information that is deemed reasonable and necessary by the controller.

Repealed.

No expenditure shall be made from the state highway funds in excess of the amount prescribed by the general assembly pursuant to section 43-1-112.5 and the amount proposed by the final budget allocation plan or amendments thereto adopted pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (9) of this section. It is the duty of the controller to disapprove any such expenditures when the reports reflect such excessive expenditures in relation to the amount prescribed by the general assembly pursuant to section 43-1-112.5 and the proposed final budget allocation plan or amendments thereto adopted pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (9) of this section.

This subsection (12) is effective July 1, 1992.

The commission shall have no power to adopt a budget allocation plan which diverts federal funds designated for other projects to any beltway within the Denver metropolitan region constructed by a public highway authority pursuant to part 5 of article 4 of this title.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (14), the fiscal year of the department of transportation shall commence on July 1 and end on June 30 of each year. The annual final budget allocation plan is to be adopted by the commission on or before April 15 of each year for the ensuing fiscal year, except for that portion of the budget for construction projects which shall be prepared as soon as practicable but not later than sixty days after receipt of notification of federal highway fund apportionments for the ensuing federal fiscal year.

The fiscal year for the department of transportation for the purpose of highway construction projects shall be a calendar year.

In any highway construction project involving an expenditure not exceeding five million dollars of state funds in any one fiscal year, the department of transportation, under the supervision and direction of the transportation commission, is authorized to enter into a single contract or agreement for such project and to finance same by revenue from more than one fiscal period. Any such project shall be budgeted by providing the required funds from future as well as current fiscal periods, and the anticipated revenues from future fiscal periods shall be shown in the final budget allocation plan for the first fiscal period in which the project appears, together with the anticipated necessary expenditures for future fiscal periods. Commitment on any such contract shall have priority for payment in the future fiscal periods after payment of such commitments as are now provided by law and after the payment of fixed expenditures for maintenance, administration, and other nonconstruction items.

If there are fewer than three bidders on a design bid build highway project, no award shall be made if the award is more than ten percent over the estimate of the department of transportation on the project; except that, if the estimate of the department on the project is less than one million dollars and there are fewer than three bidders, the executive director or the executive director's designee may make an award of more than ten percent, but less than twenty-five percent, over the estimate of the department to the low responsible bidder, as defined in section 24-101-301 (23).

Repealed.

Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in subsection (16)(a) of this section, the executive director may make an award to the low responsible bidder regardless of the estimate of the department if the executive director determines in writing that it is in the best financial, economic, or other interest of the state to do so. The written determination must be included in the contract file and made publicly available by posting on the department's website.

In its annual presentation to the joint committees of reference of the general assembly that have jurisdiction over transportation required by section 2-7-203, the department shall identify each project for which the executive director made an award pursuant to subsection (16)(c)(I) of this section and shall explain the reasons for making the award and estimate the amount of cost savings achieved by making the award.

The department shall prominently post on the home page of its website either a list of each state transportation project, regardless of the size of the project or the method of contract procurement that the department is using for the project, for which the department is seeking a contractor or a link to another page on its website that includes such a prominently posted list.

In the event that geotechnical testing or materials testing is required for any state highway project, the department of transportation may submit a request for proposals to the private sector for the completion of such testing. Such private sector individuals shall be certified by the department of transportation.

Repealed.

Any payments for transportation revenue anticipation notes issued to finance any qualified federal aid transportation project and any costs associated with the issuance and administration of such notes shall be subject to annual allocation by the commission, in its sole discretion, in accordance with part 7 of article 4 of this title.

Federal transportation funds, as defined in section 43-4-702 (4), that are paid to the state shall be allocated and used to reimburse the state highway fund, the state highway supplementary fund, or both, for any moneys in said fund or funds used to pay transportation revenue anticipation notes or any costs associated with the issuance and administration of such notes in accordance with section 43-4-705 (2)(c)(II).

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1), (3)(a), (8)(a), (9)(c)(I), and (12)(a) amended, p. 1513, § 16, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(12)(a) amended, p. 1647, § 86, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(2.5) and (18) added, p. 1297, § 5, effective June 5; (8)(a) amended, p. 667, § 109, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(19) added, p. 1119, § 3, effective June 2; (16) amended, p. 598, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2004:

(18) repealed, p. 219, § 44, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(2)(c)(VI)(B), (6)(b), and (8)(b) repealed, p. 290, § 43, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(4) and (9)(c)(I) amended, p. 593, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(16) amended, (SB 09-297), ch. 285, p. 1298, § 4, effective May 20.

L. 2010:

(8)(a) amended, (HB 10-1181), ch. 351, p. 1631, § 32, effective June 7.

L. 2014:

(2.5) amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1853, § 67, effective June 6.

L. 2015:

(16) amended, (HB 15-1046), ch. 88, p. 255, § 2, effective April 8.

L. 2017:

(16)(a) amended, (HB 17-1051), ch. 99, p. 353, § 73, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(16)(a) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1724, § 89, effective May 29; (16)(a) and (16)(c) amended, (SB 18-268), ch. 295, p. 1805, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(10) amended, (HB 21-1066), ch. 105, p. 421, § 1, effective September 7.

43-1-113.5. Creation and administration of transportation infrastructure revolving fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the transportation infrastructure revolving fund, referred to in this section as the "revolving fund", which shall be maintained and administered by the executive director. The revolving fund shall consist of federal, state, or private grants and all moneys that may be transferred or appropriated thereto by the general assembly or that may otherwise be made available to the fund pursuant to law. All interest or other return on the investment of moneys in the revolving fund and all payments of principal and interest credited to the revolving fund as repayment of loans and other financial assistance provided from the revolving fund pursuant to this section shall be credited to the revolving fund. The state treasurer shall be authorized to invest moneys in the revolving fund in such manner as allowed by law so long as such moneys are not needed for the purpose of the revolving fund. Moneys in the revolving fund are continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes set forth in this section. Any moneys credited to the revolving fund shall remain in the revolving fund and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of any given fiscal year.

(1.5) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary, on April 20, 2009, the state treasurer shall deduct three million dollars from the revolving fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

The revolving fund shall include a highway account, a transit account, an aviation account, and a rail account. The general assembly shall, by appropriation, determine how state general fund moneys in the revolving fund shall be allocated to the highway account.

The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with the "State Administrative Procedure Act" regarding:

The eligibility requirements for financial assistance from the revolving fund;

The disbursement of revolving fund moneys;

The interest rates to be charged on loans made from the revolving fund; and

The repayment of loans made from the revolving fund.

Subject to the provisions of section 18 of article X of the state constitution, moneys in the revolving fund may be used for the following purposes:

To provide assistance to public and private entities for the acquisition, improvement, or construction of highways, multimodal transportation, and intermodal transportation facilities in the state. Such assistance includes, but is not limited to, the making of loans and other forms of financial assistance for qualified projects.

To pay the costs incurred by the state treasurer and the department in the performance of duties pursuant to this section; and

Any other purpose consistent with the provisions of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, "qualified project" means:

Any public or private transportation project as authorized by the commission, including, but not limited to, planning, environmental impact studies, feasibility studies, engineering, construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, restoring, rehabilitation, or replacement of a public or private transportation facility within the state;

The acquisition of real or personal property, or interests therein, for a public or private transportation facility within the state;

Any highway, transit, aviation, rail, or other transportation project within the state that is eligible for financing or financial assistance under state or federal law;

The maintenance, repair, improvement, or construction of any public or private highway, road, street, parkway, transit, aviation, or rail project within the state; and

The acquisition, improvement, or construction of rights-of-way, bridges, tunnels, railroad-highway crossings, drainage structures, signs, guardrails, or protective structures within this state.

The term "qualified project" shall not include transportation facilities and other transportation projects that are restricted to private use.

In addition to requiring interest to be paid on loans made from the revolving fund, the executive director may charge to and collect from public and private entities receiving assistance from the revolving fund fees and charges sufficient to reimburse the department for reasonable expenses incurred in processing and reviewing applications and in recommending loans and financial assistance pursuant to the provisions of this section.

If a recipient of financial assistance from the revolving fund fails to meet any of the terms or conditions of the loan or other form of assistance, the department may bring a right of action through the state attorney general pursuant to section 43-1-112 against such recipient in district court to seek any applicable legal or equitable remedy, including reasonable attorneys fees.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (8), in addition to the remedies provided under paragraph (a) of this subsection (8), if the recipient is a municipality or county and such recipient defaults on the repayment of any loan made from the revolving fund, the department may withhold funds that it would otherwise disburse to the recipient. In no event shall the amount withheld exceed the amount that a recipient owes to the revolving fund. Funds withheld from a defaulting recipient shall be deposited in the account of the revolving fund from which the recipient received financial assistance and credited towards the amount due to such fund from the recipient.

For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection (8), the department may only withhold funds it would otherwise disburse to a municipality or county from the highway users tax fund if such municipality or county defaults on the repayment of a loan made from the revolving fund for the construction, maintenance, or supervision of a public highway in this state.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1099, § 20, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(1.5) added, (SB 09-208), ch. 149, p. 628, § 35, effective April 20.

Cross references:

For the "State Administrative Procedure Act", see article 4 of title 24.

43-1-114. Highway maintenance division - creation.

There is hereby created a highway maintenance division in the department of transportation. The executive director shall appoint the director of the division, and either the executive director, the director of the division, or another designee of the executive director shall appoint other necessary staff of the division in accordance with the provisions of section 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

The highway maintenance division and the director of the division are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions under the department and the executive director.

Whenever the chief engineer is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements, the contracts or agreements must be executed in the name of the department of transportation, state of Colorado, by the chief engineer, or his or her designee. Whenever the chief engineer is authorized to acquire or convey real or personal property, title thereto must be acquired or conveyed in the name of the department of transportation, state of Colorado, and all such conveyances must be executed by the chief engineer, or his or her designee. All suits or proceedings brought by or against the chief engineer must be in the name of the department of transportation, state of Colorado.

It is the duty of the director of the highway maintenance division, in the administration of the division, to organize the division so that all division employees so far as possible, are interchangeable in work assignment and may be shifted within the division to meet seasonal and emergency demands.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1039, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 175, § 6, effective March 30.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3431, § 219, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

43-1-115. Transportation data collection.

The transportation development division shall compile and maintain consistent information concerning the condition of the streets, roads, highways, and other transportation systems of this state. Such information shall be obtained from data available to the division, counties, and municipalities and shall be obtained from the appropriate personnel of the transportation development division, the governmental officials of any county or municipality in the state, or any other person deemed appropriate by the transportation development division. The transportation development division, after consultation with representatives of municipalities and counties, shall establish and disseminate a uniform method of reporting such information.

The information obtained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be reported annually in conjunction with the reports required to be submitted pursuant to sections 43-2-120 (5) and 43-2-132 (5).

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-106.5 as it existed prior to 1991.

43-1-116. Engineering, design, and construction division - created - duties - environmental justice and equity branch.

There is hereby created, in the department of transportation, the engineering, design, and construction division, the head of which shall be the chief engineer.

The engineering, design, and construction division and the office of the chief engineer are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions under the department of transportation and the executive director.

The engineering, design, and construction division shall be responsible for all engineering, design, and construction operations of the department.

The department shall update the bidding rules regarding prequalification requirements, including the contract amounts for which a bidder is required to submit an audited financial statement reviewed by a certified public accountant. In addition, the chief engineer shall develop a policy regarding how previous relevant experience and the bonding capacity of a contractor will be considered when evaluating proposals and bids submitted for public projects.

The environmental justice and equity branch is created in the engineering, design, and construction division. The function of the environmental justice and equity branch is to work directly with disproportionately impacted communities, as well as with other department programs, in the project planning, environmental study, and project delivery phases of transportation capacity projects. The environmental justice and equity branch shall identify and address technological, language, and information barriers that may prevent disproportionately impacted communities from participating fully in transportation decisions that affect health, quality of life, and access for disadvantaged and minority businesses in project delivery.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1041, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(4) added, (SB 17-211), ch. 373, p. 1936, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(5) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1412, § 28, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3431, § 220, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

43-1-117. Transportation development division - created - duties - freight mobility and safety branch - repeal.

There is hereby created, in the department of transportation, the transportation development division, the head of which shall be the director of the transportation development division, which office is hereby created.

The transportation development division and the office of the director of the division are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions under the department of transportation and the executive director.

The transportation development division shall be responsible for the implementation of the provisions of part 11 of this article.

The freight mobility and safety branch is created in the transportation development division. The function of the freight mobility and safety branch is to plan, design, and implement programs and projects that enhance freight mobility and safety within the state. No later than January 1, 2022, the freight mobility and safety branch shall provide to the commission a long-term strategic plan that sets forth the vision and goals for the branch, key priorities for all freight-related programs, activities, and projects, and guidelines for coordination between the branch and the freight advisory committee.

Three days after May 26, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the general fund to the state highway fund created in section 43-1-219 for use by the transportation development division as additional funding for the revitalizing main streets program, giving priority to programs that improve air quality through increased use of transit.

This subsection (5) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1041, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1412, § 29, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(5) added, (SB 22-180), ch. 236, p. 1741, § 3, effective May 26; (2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3432, § 221, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the legislative declaration in SB 22-180, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.